Washington statutes.
RCW 43.176.010

Policy.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the state of Washington to assist in the creation and expansion of innovative small commercial enterprises that produce marketable goods and services through the employment of Washington residents, the use of technology, and the application of best management practices. This policy is to be implemented through the use of small business incubators.

[ 2004 c 237 s 1.]